South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 41-35-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 41-35-40.  (A) An insured worker's weekly benefit amount is fifty percent of his weekly average wage, as defined in Section 41-27-140, and the weekly benefit amount, if not a multiple of one dollar, must be computed to the next lower multiple of one dollar.  However, no insured worker's weekly benefit amount may be less than forty-two dollars nor greater than sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the statewide average weekly wage most recently computed before the beginning of the individual's benefit yearthree hundred fifty dollars. (B) The maximum weekly benefit amount set each year by the department within the range established in subsection (A) must be published on the department's website. (C)(B) The procedure for reconsideration of determinations pursuant to Section 41-35-640 is the sole and exclusive procedure and remedy for disputing the department's determination of an insured worker's weekly benefit amount. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----